Hawaii statutes.
§388-2 Semimonthly payday; method of
payment of wages. (a) Every employer shall pay all wages due to the
employer's employees at least twice during each calendar month, on regular
paydays designated in advance by the employer, in lawful money of the United
States, with checks convertible into cash on demand at full face value thereof,
by direct deposit to the employee's account at a federally insured depository
institution as provided in subsection (d), or by other means as provided in
section 388-5.7; provided that when a majority of an employer's employees or a
majority of the employees in a collective bargaining unit recognized by an
employer or established by law elect, in a secret ballot election under
procedures approved by the director of labor and industrial relations, to be
paid once a month on a regularly scheduled basis, the employees shall be paid
on such monthly basis. The elections shall not be held more frequently than
once in every two years and each election shall be valid for a period of two
years.

(b) The earned wages of all employees shall be
due and payable within seven days after the end of each pay period.

(c) The director may, upon application showing
good and sufficient reasons, permit an employer to:

(1) Establish regular paydays less frequently than
semimonthly; provided that the employee shall be paid in full at least once
each calendar month on a regularly established schedule; or

(2) Pay earned wages within fifteen days after the
end of each pay period.

(d) An employer may
pay wages due to the employer's employees by direct deposit to the employee's
account at a financial institution; provided that:

(1) The employee has voluntarily authorized, in
writing or via electronic signature, the direct deposit to the account and
financial institution of the employee's choice;

(2) The deposits and accounts of the financial
institution selected are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
or any other comparable federal or state agency;

(3) The employee may cancel the direct deposit at any
time with reasonable notice;

(4) The employer shall provide a pay statement as
required under section 388-7(4);

(5) No employee shall be required to pay any costs or
fees for the direct deposit of wages into the employee's account; and

(6) No employee may be disciplined or otherwise
penalized for authorizing or refusing to authorize the direct deposit of wages.
[L 1963, c 158, pt of §3; am L 1964, c 20, §2; Supp, §95-2; HRS §388-2; gen ch
1985; am L 1989, c 32, §1; am L 2014, c 208, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next